Illinois, session 104th, SB2345.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Law 5Enforcement Hiring Act.6This Act may be referred to as the Sonya Massey Act. 7    Section 5. Law Enforcement Hiring Task Force.8    (a) The Law Enforcement Hiring Task Force is created. The 9Task Force shall:10        (1) identify various measures to ensure that unfit 11    candidates are not hired as law enforcement officers;12        (2) explore strategies to prevent unnecessary deaths 13    caused by law enforcement officers; and14        (3) make a report to the General Assembly no later 15    than June 30, 2026 with recommendations for preventing 16    people with dangerous backgrounds from being hired as law 17    enforcement officers in the State.18    (b) The task force shall have the following members:19        (1) 3 members appointed by the Senate President;20        (2) 3 members appointed by the Speaker of the House of 21    Representatives;22        (3) 2 members appointed by the Minority Leader of the 23    House of Representative;  SB2345- 2 -LRB104 10975 RTM 21057 b1        (4) 2 members appointed by the Minority Senate Leader; 2    and3        (5) 3 members appointed by the Governor. 4    Section 10. Law enforcement hiring background checks. A 5law enforcement agency may not hire a law enforcement officer 6without reviewing background disciplinary actions, 7terminations, and administrative review from previous 8employers. A law enforcement agency may not hire a law 9enforcement officer if the law enforcement officer spent less 10than 30 days reviewing the law enforcement officer.